District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.06

Known claims against dissolved corporation.

(a)

A dissolved nonprofit corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by delivering notice to its known claimants of the dissolution at any time after its effective date.

(b)

The notice shall be in the form of a record and:

(1)

Describe information that shall be included in a claim;

(2)

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

(3)

State the deadline, which may not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the notice, by which the dissolved nonprofit corporation must receive the claim; and

(4)

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

(c)

A claim against the dissolved nonprofit corporation shall be barred if the claimant:

(1)

That was given notice under subsection (b) of this section does not deliver the claim to the dissolved corporation by the deadline; or

(2)

Whose claim was rejected by the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the effective date of the rejection notice.

(d)

For purposes of this section, the term “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-412.07, § 29-412.09, and § 29-412.23.

Section References